Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-9,174
Violation; complaint; prerequisite to other remedy.

No original action asserting a violation of the Nebraska Equal Opportunity in Postsecondary Education Act may be filed in any district court unless a complaint asserting such violation is first filed with the governing board of the educational institution committing such discriminatory act or practice and disposed of or withdrawn as provided in the act.

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1094.